Maryland, session 2026, HB0101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
24–201.
There is a Maryland Public Broadcasting Commission.
24–208.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “GENERAL ELECTION” INCLUDES A SPECIAL GENERAL ELECTION.
(3) “PUBLIC BROADCASTER” MEANS A BROADCASTER THAT
RECEIVES FUNDS, INCLUDING GRANTS OR LOANS, FROM THE STATE IN A GIVEN
FISCAL YEAR.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO:
(1) PROMOTE OPEN, DEMOCRATIC DISCOURSE;
(2) STRENGTHEN PUBLIC CONFIDENCE IN THE STATE’S DEMOCRATIC
INSTITUTIONS; AND
(3) ENSURE THAT STATE FUNDING FOR PUBLIC BROADCASTERS IS
CONDITIONED ON THE INVITATION OF ALL CANDIDATES TO A DEBATE WHO ARE
CERTIFIED TO THE BALLOT FOR A GENERAL ELECTION FOR STATEWIDE OFFICE.
(C) A PUBLIC BROADCASTER THAT HOLDS A DEBATE BETWEEN
CANDIDATES FOR STATEWIDE OFFICE:

HOUSE BILL 101 3
(1) SHALL INVITE TO PARTICIPATE ALL CANDIDATES FOR THAT
STATEWIDE OFFICE WHO ARE CERTIFIED TO THE BALLOT IN THE GENERAL
ELECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE APPLICABLE PROVISIONS OF THE ELECTION
LAW ARTICLE;
(2) SHALL PROVIDE EQUITABLE OPPORTUNITY TO EACH
PARTICIPATING CANDIDATE TO CONTRIBUTE AND RESPOND IN THE DEBATE; AND
(3) MAY NOT CONDITION ELIGIBILITY FOR OR INVITATIONS TO THE
DEBATE ON CAMPAIGN FUNDRAISING METRICS, PARTY AFFILIATION, OR POLLING
METRICS.
(D) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL REQUIRE A PUBLIC BROADCASTER TO
INVITE A CANDIDATE TO PARTICIPATE IN A DEBATE WHO:
(1) IS A WRITE–IN CANDIDATE; OR
(2) HAS FORMALLY OR INFORMALLY SUSPENDED OR TERMINATED
THE CANDIDATE’S CAMPAIGN.
(E) (1) IF A PUBLIC BROADCASTER HOLDS A DEBATE IN VIOLATION OF
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE FISCAL YEAR IN
WHICH THE DEBATE OCCURS:
(I) THE PUBLIC BROADCASTER MAY NOT USE STATE FUNDS;
AND
(II) A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT MAY NOT PROVIDE FUNDS
TO THE PUBLIC BROADCASTER.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A PROPOSED AMENDED
APPROPRIATION TO THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT TO REQUEST
THAT ANY REMAINING STATE FUNDS FROM A PUBLIC BROADCASTER THAT VIOLATES
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BE REAPPROPRIATED TO ANOTHER PROGRAM
FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR.
(II) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPROVE AN AMENDED
APPROPRIATION SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to

HOUSE BILL 101
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.